es: Estilo de techo: Soporte A-frame; Puro; Aguilón; Gambrel/Granero; Limatesa; Cobertizo; Saltbox; Cobertizo/cobertizo; Otros
el: Στυλ στέγης: Τύπου Α; Επίπεδη; Αέτωμα; Γαμήλιο θηρίο/Αχυρώνας; Τετράριχτη; Lean-to; Αλατιέρα; Σκιλιόν/Αποθήκη; Άλλο
tr: Çatı stili: A-çerçeve; Düz; Beşik çatı; Gambrel / ahır tipi çatı; Kırma; Sundurma; Saltbox; Tek eğimli / sundurma tipi; Diğer
da: Tagstil: A-ramme; Flad; Gavl; Gambrel/lade; Trendy; Hældning; Saltkasse; Skillion/skur; Andet
sv: Takstil: A-ram; Platt; Gavel; Gambrel/Lada; Höft; Lutande; Saltlåda; Skillion/Skjul; Annat
zh-TW: 屋頂樣式: A 字架; 平坦; 山牆; 復斜/穀倉; 斜脊; 斜頂; 鹽盒; 披屋/棚屋; 其他
sl-SI: Slog strehe: A-okvir; Ploščata; Zatrep; Gambrel/hlev; Do bokov; Nadstrešek; Solna škatla; Skillion/lopa; Druga
ko: 지붕 스타일: A프레임; 플랫; 박공; 갬브렐/헛간; 엉덩이; 덧지붕; 솔트박스; 스킬리온/외판; 기타
fi: Katon tyyli: A-katto; Tasakatto; Harjakatto; Mansardikatto; Aumakatto; Pulpettikatto; Saltbox-katto; Lisärakennus/varasto; Muu
lt-LT: Stogo stilius: A formos rėmas; Plokščia; Dvišlaitis; Laužytas / tvarto tipo; Iki klubų; Prie sienos šlaitinis; „Saltbox“ tipo; Vienšlaitis / pastogės tipo; Kita
ru: Тип крыши: А-образная; Плоская; Двускатная; Мансардная/амбарная; Вальмовая; Односкатная; Асимметричная двускатная; Скатная/сарай; Другая
ro-RO: Stilul acoperișului: În formă de A; Plat; Acoperiș cu doi versanți; Hambar; În patru ape; Adâncitură; Șopron; Acoperiș asimetric; Altele
it: Stile del tetto: Telaio A; Piatto; Timpano; Gambrel/Fienile; Fianco; Addossato; Saltbox; Capannone/capannone; Altro
pl: Typ dachu: Dwuspadowy; Płaski; Dach dwuspadowy; Dach mansardowy / stodołowy; Czterospadowy; Dach jednospadowy (lean-to); Dach typu saltbox; Szopa/Szopa; Inne
cs: Typ střechy: Typu A; Plochá; Sedlová; Mansardová; Valbová; Přístavková; Saltbox; Pultová; Jiná
hu: Tetőstílus: A-frame; Lapos; Csúcsos; Nyereg-/pajtatető; Konty; Ferde; Asszimetrikus; Skillion/pajta; Egyéb
nl: Dakstijl: A-frame; Vlak; Zadeldek; Mansardedak/Schuur; Heup; Lessenaarsdak; Saltbox-dak; Schuin dak/schuur; Overig
de: Dachform: A-Frame; Flach; Giebel; Satteldach/Scheune; Hüfte; Pultdach; Saltbox; Skillion/Schuppen; Sonstiges
ja: 屋根のスタイル: Aフレーム; フラット; 切り妻; 腰折れ/納屋; 寄棟; 片流れ; ソルトボックス; スキリオン/小屋; その他
th: รูปแบบหลังคา: โครงรูปตัว A; แบบแบน; หน้าจั่ว; แกมเบรล/โรงนา; คาดสะโพก; เพิงหมาแหงน; ทรงจั่วไม่สมมาตร; เพิงลาดเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: Estilo de telhado: Tipo cavalete; Plano; Frontão; Gambrel/Celeiro; Quatro águas; Abrigo; Saltbox; Telhado de uma água/Galpão; Outro
sk-SK: Štýl strechy: A-rám; Plochá; Sedlová; Dvojitá sedlová/Stodolová; Valbová; Nadväzujúca na existujúcu stavbu; Asymetrická sedlová; Pultová/s jedným sklonom; Iné
pt-BR: Estilo do telhado: Estrutura em A; Plana; Frontão; Gambrel/Celeiro; Atual; Telhado inclinado; Saltbox; Telhado de uma água/Shed; Outro
fr: Style de toiture: Support en A; Plate; Pignon; Mansarde/grange; Hanche; Appentis; Saltbox; Abri de jardin/maison à un seul versant; Autre
hr-HR: Stil krova: U obliku slova A; Ravna; Zabat; Mansarda/štala; Kosi; Naslonjen; Saltbox; Skillion/šupa; Ostalo
zh-CN: 屋顶样式: A 型; 平顶; 人字型; 斜脊/谷仓式; 四坡型; 单坡式; 盐盒式; 斜顶/棚式; 其他
en: Roof style: A-frame; Flat; Gable; Gambrel/Barn; Hip; Lean-to; Saltbox; Skillion/Shed; Other
vi: Kiểu mái nhà: Khung chữ A; Phẳng; Mái đầu hồi; Mái kiểu chuồng ngựa/nhà kho; Ống tên để hông; Mái hiên; Mái kiểu hộp muối; Mái một dốc/Nhà kho; Khác
nb: Takstil: A-ramme; Flat; Gavl; Gambrel/Låve; Hofte; Lenestol; Saltboks; Skillion/Skur; Annet
bg-BG: Стил на покрива: А-образно; Плоско; Фронтон; Мансарда/обор; Четирискатен (валмов); Навес; Асиметрично; Скатен/наклонен; Друго